de: Hörverlustgrad: Leicht; Mäßig; Hochgradig; Schwer; Sonstiges
lt-LT: Klausos praradimo lygis: Šiltas; Vidutinės; Gilus; Sunkus; Kita
es: Nivel de pérdida auditiva: Suave; Moderado; Profundo; Severo; Otros
th: ระดับการสูญเสียการได้ยิน: อ่อน; ปานกลาง; รุนแรงมาก; รุนแรง; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 聽力損失程度: 輕微; 中; 極重度; 重度; 其他
sl-SI: Stopnja izgube sluha: Blago; Zmerna; Globoka; Huda; Drugo
pt-BR: Nível de perda auditiva: Ameno; Moderado; Profunda; Severa; Outro
sv: Hörselnedsättningsnivå: Mild; Måttlig; Grav; Svår; Övrigt
pt-PT: Nível de perda auditiva: Ameno; Moderado; Profundo; Severo; Outro
en: Hearing loss level: Mild; Moderate; Profound; Severe; Other
nb: Hørselstapsnivå: Mild; Moderat; Dyp; Alvorlig; Annet
ro-RO: Nivel de pierdere a auzului: Ușor; Moderată; Profundă; Severă; Altele
da: Høretabsgrad: Mild; Moderat; Dybtgående; Svær; Andet
nl: Gehoorverliesniveau: Mild; Gemiddeld; Diep; Ernstig; Andere
fi: Kuulon menetyksen taso: Lievä; Kohtalainen; Syvällinen; Vaikea; Muu
hu: Hallásvesztés szintje: Enyhe; Mérsékelt; Mélyfokú; Súlyos; Egyéb
fr: Niveau de perte auditive: Modéré; Modéré; Profond; Sévère; Autre
it: Livello di perdita uditiva: Intensità lieve; Moderato; Profondo; Grave; Altro
sk-SK: Úroveň straty sluchu: Mierny; Stredný; Hlboký; Ťažký; Iné
bg-BG: Ниво на загуба на слух: Леко; Умерена; Дълбока; Тежка; Други
cs: Úroveň ztráty sluchu: Jemné; Průměrný; Hluboká; Těžká; Jiné
pl: Poziom ubytku słuchu: Delikatny; Umiarkowany; Głęboki; Ciężki; Inne
ja: 聴力損失レベル: マイルド; 中程度; 重度; 高度; その他
ru: Уровень потери слуха: Умеренный; Средний; Глубокая; Тяжелая; Другой
hr-HR: Razina gubitka sluha: Blago; Umjereno; Duboki; Teški; Ostalo
tr: İşitme kaybı seviyesi: Ilık; Ortalama; İleri derecede; Ağır; Diğer
el: Επίπεδο απώλειας ακοής: Ήπιο; Μέτρια; Βαριά; Σοβαρή; Άλλο
vi: Mức độ mất thính lực: Dịu nhẹ; Vừa phải; Rất nặng; Nặng; Khác
zh-CN: 听力损失程度: 温和; 中速; 极重度; 重度; 其他
ko: 난청 수준: 마일드; 보통; 심도; 고도; 기타